src/orthography/spellrelax_acorbiere.xfscript
!keeping list to what has been observed to trip up machine (ziizbaakdoke as ziisbaakdoke)
define zCsC     [z (->) s || _ b] ;  !zb has been kept as normative
define ao       [a (->) o || k _ w] ;  !a has been kept as normative
define gnMet    [g n (->) n g ||   _  \[a|e|i|o]]  ;  !gn kept as normative
define yapos    [y (->) %' ||  [a|e|i|o] _  [a|e|i|o]]  ;  !y kept as normative
define bndm     [b n (->) m || _ d] ; !bnd kept as normative ... this could tie into the medial nasal dropping rule
define gggk     [g (->) 0 || .#. _ [g|k]] ; !gg, gk kept as normative
define nds      [d (->) 0  || n _ s] ; !nds kept as normative
define hyph     [%- (->) 0  || b m i _ y a a] ; !bmi-yaa kept as normative
define oa       [o (->) a || \[o] _, _ \[o]];  !old environment|| m \[o] _ t, s _, n _ k] nso kept as normative
define glotGlide [h (->) w || [a|e|i|o] _ [a|e|i|o]] ; 
define wy       [w (->) y, y (->) w || [a|e|i|o]  _  [a|e|i|o]] ;  !getting checked !this is a bit more general than what we have for MAC (assimilation to vowel backness)
define nasV     [n y (->) 0 || _ m ] ; !not in cascade
define owa      [o (->) w a || [g|k] _ ] ;
define yanyin   [a (->) i || y _ [n|g|k] .#. ] ; 
define ny2nh    [n y (->) n h] ; 
define mergeLen [
                    b b (->) p .o.
                    d d (->) t .o.
                    g g (->) k .o.
                    j j (->) c h .o.
                    z z (->) s .o.
                    z h z h (->) s h
                    ] ;

define wag2oog [w a  (->) o o || _ [g|n] .#.] ; 
define iioo2io [i (->) i i || \[i] _ [g|n|n g] .#.,, !variation in vowel length before pl/obv/loc
                o (->) o o || \[o] _ [g|n|n g] .#.,,
                i i (->) i , o o (->) o || _ [g|n|n g] .#.
                ] ; 

!define mndmd    [m n d (->) m d || .#. _ ] ; !captured by stranded nasal dropping rule in phonology module
!define ndmz      [m (->) 0  || n d _ z] ; !captured by stranded nasal dropping rule in phonology module

!apostrophe use covered in spellrelax_valentine.xfscript
define apos     [[..] (->) %' || \[a|e|i|o] _ \[a|e|i|o] ,,
                h (->) %' || \[c|s|z|n] _ ]; 

regex [
    zCsC    .o.
    ao      .o.
    gnMet   .o.
    yapos   .o.
    bndm    .o.
    gggk    .o.
    nds     .o.
    hyph    .o.
    oa      .o.
    glotGlide .o.
    wy      .o.
    yanyin  .o.
    ny2nh   .o.
    owa     .o.
    mergeLen  .o.
    apos .o.
    wag2oog .o.
    iioo2io
    ];
save stack spellrelaxAcorbiere.hfst
